New York, session 2025-2026, S236.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision 1 of section 510.10 of 2 the criminal procedure law, as amended by section 2 of subpart A of part 3 VV of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 When a principal, whose future court attendance at a criminal action 5 or proceeding is or may be required, comes under the control of a court, 6 such court shall impose a securing order in accordance with this title. 7 Except as otherwise required by law, the court shall make an individual- 8 ized determination as to whether the principal poses a current physical 9 danger to the safety of any crime victim, person or the community and 10 make an individualized determination as to whether the principal poses a 11 risk of flight to avoid prosecution[,]. The court shall consider the 12 kind and degree of control or restriction necessary to reasonably assure 13 the principal's return to court and the safety of any crime victim, 14 person or the community, and select a securing order consistent with its 15 determination under this subdivision. The court shall explain the basis 16 for its determination and its choice of securing order on the record or 17 in writing. In making a determination under this subdivision, the court 18 must consider and take into account available information about the 19 principal, including: 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00915-01-5